Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

Scenic Highway System Act of 1971

54-17-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Scenic Highway System Act of 1971.”

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2501.

Attorney General Opinions. Designation of interstates as scenic highways, OAG 97-061 (5/1/97).

Comparative Legislation. Scenic roadways:

Ala. Code § 23-1-220 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-67-203.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-6-119.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 177.090.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-3-35 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 226.750 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-122 et seq.

Va. Code § 33.1-62 et seq.

Collateral References. Highways
153 et seq.

54-17-102. Scenic highway system established.

There is established a system of scenic highways for the state.

The system shall consist of those highways or roads or sections of the highways or roads that are so designated by the general assembly from time to time according to this part.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 2; 1976, ch. 819, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2502.

54-17-103. Chapter definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Advertise” means to establish an outdoor display by painting, pasting, or affixing on any surface, a picture, emblem, word, figure, numeral, or lettering for the purpose of making anything known;

“Directional sign” means an official sign that identifies a site, attraction, or activity and directional information useful to a traveler in locating the site, attraction, or activity, including mileage, route numbers, or exit numbers;

“Facility” means a commercial or industrial facility, or other facility open to the public, that operates with regular business hours on a year-round basis within a building or defined physical space, which may include a structure other than a building, together with any immediately adjacent parking areas; provided, that activity conducted in a temporary structure or a structure operated only on a seasonal basis may be considered a facility for the purpose of allowing an on-premises device to be located on the same property, but the device is only allowed on a temporary basis during the period the facility is actually conducting activity;

“On-premises device” means a sign:

That is located within fifty feet (50') of, and on the same parcel of property and on the same side of the highway as, the facility that owns or operates the sign or within fifty feet (50') of, and on the same parcel of property and on the same side of the highway as, the entrance to the parcel of property upon which two (2) or more facilities are located; and

For which compensation is not being received and not intended to be received;

“Outdoor advertising device”:

Means a sign that is operated or owned by a person or entity that is earning compensation directly or indirectly from a third party or parties for the placement of a message on the sign; and

Does not include a sign that is an on-premises device or other type of sign exempt from regulation under this chapter;

“Scenic highway” means any highway, road, or sections of the highway or road designated as a scenic highway from time to time by the general assembly under this part; and

“Sign” means an outdoor sign, light, display, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, placard, poster, billboard, or other thing which is designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform any part of the advertising or informative contents of which is visible from any place on the main traveled way of an interstate system or primary system.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 3; 1976, ch. 819, § 2; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2503; Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in the definition of “Advertisement”, substituted “Advertise” for “Advertisement” and “to establish an outdoor” for “the outdoor”; added the definitions of “Directional sign”, “Facility”, “On-premises device”, “Outdoor advertising device”, and “Sign”; and deleted the definition of “Sign, structure or advertising device”, which read: “means any structure, post, tree, fence, rock, rigid or semirigid, with or without advertising displayed on the device, situated upon or attached to real property outdoors, primarily for the purpose of furnishing a background or support upon which advertisement may be affixed.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-17-104. Purposes, standards and objectives.

The purposes of this part and its specific objectives and standards are to:

Provide for the recovery and conservation of natural scenic beauty along designated scenic highways;

Provide a safe and attractive environment for tourists and travelers to enjoy the scenic beauty of the state;

Maximize the potential of little used and bypassed sections of highway;

Return economic viability to distressed areas through the promotion of tourism; and

Provide for preservation of routes of historical significance in urban and rural areas of the state.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 4; 1973, ch. 9, § 3; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2504.

54-17-105. Eligibility for scenic highway designation — Requirements of designation — Comprehensive plan.

Highways or thoroughfares that are maintained through the use of state or federal funds, and that are not needed for essential commercial or defense traffic, shall be eligible for designation as scenic highways, with exceptions the general assembly may from time to time consider necessary by designation in § 54-17-114.

The designation of additions to the scenic highway system shall conform to the following criteria:

Highways designated as scenic highways shall be components of a comprehensive system as outlined by a statewide scenic highway plan;

Scenic highways shall travel through scenic, historic, geologic and pastoral areas of the state;

Highways should be designated to offer alternative travel routes to the high-speed, heavily traveled highways in the state;

Designated highways shall provide the motorist with safe and relaxing routes of travel; and

Scenic highways shall conform to an interconnected state scenic highway system, except in unusual situations whereby a highway is judged desirable for inclusion within the system because of unique scenic, historical, geologic or pastoral features.

The commissioner of transportation shall, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee, prepare a comprehensive statewide scenic highway plan. In the preparation of this plan, the commissioner may consult as necessary with the department of environment and conservation, the department of agriculture, the department of economic and community development, the respective development districts across the state, and the Tennessee historical commission. The comprehensive plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

The major routes of travel of tourists through the state so as to maximize the use of scenic highways by visitors in the state;

The desirability of connecting components of the Tennessee outdoor recreation area system, prominent historic sites, major cities, federal recreation areas, scenic, geologic and pastoral areas, and other desirable areas by a scenic highway system;

An interconnected system of scenic highways to enable the motorist to traverse the state of Tennessee on scenic roads;

Certain theme scenic highways of historical significance that would be beneficial and educational for travel by the citizens of the state and its visitors;

An administrative framework for marking and maintaining individual components of the Tennessee scenic highway system;

A report on the fiscal impact of recommended highways, including funds necessary to initiate and maintain those highways;

Recommended specific highways to be designated by the general assembly as scenic highways in compliance with § 54-17-104, and subdivisions (b)(1)-(4), unless the general assembly by act designates specific exceptions to the requirements; and

A uniform program for signing, marking, and promoting the Tennessee scenic highway system.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 5; 1973, ch. 9, § 1; 1976, ch. 819, § 3; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2505; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1990, ch. 1024, § 30; 1992, ch. 693, § 17; 2013, ch. 308, § 31.

Code Commission Notes.

The state planning office, formerly referred to in this section, was changed to the department of economic and community development by the code commission in 2008.

Former subsection (d), concerning the comprehensive state scenic highway plan being presented to the general assembly no later than January 15, 1978, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2008.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment, in (c), substituted “commissioner of transportation” for “commissioner of tourist development” near the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “may consult as necessary with the department of environment and conservation, the department of agriculture” for “shall consult with the departments of transportation, environment and conservation, and agriculture” near the beginning of the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-17-106. Severability.

If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this part are declared to be severable.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-17-106 concerned proposals for scenic highway additions.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-17-107. Management — Promotion.

Once the general assembly designates a highway or road or a portion of the highway or road as a scenic highway, the state or local agency having jurisdiction of the highway shall erect appropriate signs marking the designation, in accordance with the rules and regulations authorized to be promulgated, from funds appropriated by the general assembly for that purpose. The signs shall conform to standards established by the comprehensive statewide scenic highway plan; furthermore, the state or local agency having jurisdiction over the particular scenic highway shall provide proper marking, maintenance, and refuse removal services in connection with the highway.

The department of tourist development shall study each newly designated scenic highway with the intention of including it in state and national promotional campaigns. In no instance may scenic highways be promoted through advertisement on any sign, structure or advertising device other than signs used for marking scenic highways by the department of transportation or local agency having jurisdiction.

The department of economic and community development shall act to coordinate the efforts of local planning commissions, development districts, chambers of commerce, convention and visitors bureaus, and other federal, state, local, and private organizations in continuing the promotion and development of the scenic highway system.

[Deleted by 2013 amendment.]

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1976, ch. 819, § 5; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2507; Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 33.

Code Commission Notes.

The state planning office, formerly referred to in this section, was changed to the department of economic and community development by the code commission in 2008.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted (d) which read: “The maximum recommended speed limit for scenic highways shall conform to appropriate standards of traffic volume and motorist safety as determined by the agency having jurisdiction, but should not exceed fifty miles per hour (50 mph).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-17-108. Advertising or junkyards prohibited on scenic highways — Authority of commissioner to acquire.

Whenever a road or highway has been designated part of the system, it is unlawful for any person to construct, use, operate or maintain any sign, except as provided in subsection (c) or § 54-17-109, or junkyard within two thousand feet (2,000') of any road or highway that is a designated part of the system and that is located either outside the corporate limits of any city or town or at any place within a tourist resort county, as defined in § 42-1-301.

The commissioner is authorized to acquire an outdoor advertising device or junkyard by purchase, gift, or condemnation, and to pay just compensation for the removal of these devices and junkyards.

Any outdoor advertising device lawfully in existence prior to the designation of the scenic byway may be maintained, repaired, or reconstructed according to the original application for the outdoor advertising permit.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 8; 1976, ch. 819, § 6; T.C.A., § 54-2508; Acts 1981, ch. 166, § 1; 1991, ch. 301, §§ 1, 4; 2020, ch. 706, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, substituted “sign, except as provided in subsection (c) or § 54-17-109,” for “advertising structure” in (a); substituted “an outdoor advertising device” for “the advertising structure”, and “devices” for ”structures” in (b); and added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Applicability to parkway system, § 54-17-206.

Billboard regulation and control, title 54, ch. 21.

Certain advertising permitted on scenic highways, § 54-17-109.

Junkyard Control Act, title 54, ch. 20, part 1.

Removal or abatement of advertising structures and junkyards, § 54-17-110.

Attorney General Opinions. State billboard regulations, OAG 04-082 (4/30/04).

54-17-109. Excepted signs.

The following signs are excepted from § 54-17-108:

Official signs and notices, including directional and warning signs, authorized or required by law;

Utility signs; and

Signs other than outdoor advertising devices, as defined in § 54-21-102, if such signs:

Have a sign face that does not exceed one hundred square feet (100 sq. ft.) in total area if the sign is an on-premises device; or

Have a sign face that does not exceed twelve square feet (12 sq. ft.) in total area if the sign is not an on-premises device;

Do not contain any flashing, intermittent, or moving lights; and

Are located at least one thousand feet (1,000') apart along the highway frontage if the signs are on-premises devices larger than twelve square feet (12 sq. ft.) and more than one (1) such sign is located on the same property.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1976, ch. 819, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-2509; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 16; 1995, ch. 476, § 2; 1995, ch. 530, §§ 1, 3-5; 1996, ch. 1000, §§ 1, 3-7; 1997, ch. 71, § 1; 1997, ch. 156, § 2; 2000, ch. 615, § 1; 2020, ch. 706, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 530, §§ 3 and 4 enumerated populations whose counties would not be subject to (15)(A). However, in light of § 5 of that act, set out in (15)(B), §§ 3 and 4 are deemed to be of no effect and have not been set out above.

Acts 1996, ch. 1000, § 2 provided for the repeal of Acts 1995, ch. 518, § 6 concerning the inapplicability of that act to any scenic highway compiled in title 54, chapter 17, part 1.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote this section which read: “The following advertising structures, or parts of the structures, are excepted from all provisions of § 54-17-108; however, as to advertising structures referred to in subdivisions (1)-(3) and (10), this exception shall not apply if the structures are larger than one hundred square feet (100 sq. ft.) or more frequent than one (1) sign of permissible size to every one thousand feet (1,000') per road or highway frontage, except that an owner or lessee may display at least one (1) sale or rental sign of permissible size on each piece of property for sale or rent: “(1) Those constructed by the owner or lessee of a place of business or residence on land belonging to the owner or lessee and not more than one hundred feet (100') from the place of business or residence, and relating solely to merchandise services or entertainment sold, produced, manufactured or furnished at the place of business or residence; “(2) Those constructed, erected, operated, used or maintained on any farm by the owner or lessee of the farm and relating solely to farm produce, merchandise, service or entertainment sold, produced, manufactured or furnished on the farm; “(3) Those upon real property posted or displayed by the owner or by the authority of the owner, stating that real property is for sale or rent; “(4) Official notices or advertisements posted or displayed by or under the direction of any public or court officer in the performance of the officer's official or directed duties, or by trustees under deeds of trust, deeds of assignment or other similar instruments; “(5) Danger or precautionary signs relating to the premises on which they are located, signs warning of the condition of or dangers of travel on a highway or road, erected or authorized by the department of transportation or applicable local agency or forest fire warning signs erected under authority of the department of agriculture and signs, notices or symbols erected by the United States government under the direction of the United States forest service; “(6) Signs solely to denote route to any city, town, village or historic place or shrine; “(7) Notices of any railroad, bridge, ferry or other transportation or transmission company necessary for the direction or safety of the public; “(8) Signs, notices or symbols for the information of aviators as to location, directions and landings and conditions affecting safety in aviation; “(9) Signs or notices placed at a junction of two (2) or more roads in the state highway system denoting only the distance or direction of a residence or subdivision; “(10) Signs or notices erected or maintained on property giving the name of the owner, lessee or occupant of the premises; “(11) Advertisements, advertising signs and advertising structures within the corporate limits of cities or towns; “(12) Historical markers erected by duly constituted authorized public authorities; “(13) Highway or road markers and signs erected or caused to be erected by duly authorized public authorities; “(14) Signs erected on property warning the public against hunting and fishing or trespassing; “(15) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (15)(B), tourist oriented directional signs complying with chapter 5, part 13 of this title; “(B) (i) Subdivision (15)(A) shall not apply in counties having a population, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of: not less than not more than 285,000 286,000 335,000 336,000 “(ii) Subdivision (15)(A) shall only apply to a local government coming under its provisions after January 1, 1996, which by vote of its local legislative body chooses to apply subdivision (15)(A) to itself. Any tourist oriented directional signs program (TODS) authorized by the general assembly before January 1, 1996, shall continue in operation as originally authorized; and “(16) Directional signs of eight square feet (8 sq. ft.) or less for churches and nonprofit educational institutions. The signs must be located off the roadway or highway right-of-way.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Advertising structures or junkyards prohibited on scenic highways, authority of commissioner to acquire, § 54-17-108.

Applicability to parkway system, § 54-17-206.

Billboard regulation and control, title 54, ch. 21.

Removal or abatement of advertising structures and junkyards, § 54-17-110.

Attorney General Opinions. State billboard regulations, OAG 04-082 (4/30/04).

Collateral References.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures. 81 A.L.R.3d 486.

54-17-110. Removal or abatement of advertising structures and junkyards.

Any advertising structure or junkyard that is constructed or erected in violation of this part constitutes a public nuisance subject to abatement as provided by law.

If the advertising structure or junkyard is declared a nuisance, it shall immediately be removed or abated and for that purpose the district attorney general or the district attorney general's duly appointed representative or any authorized representative of the state may enter onto private property without incurring any liability.

The power of eminent domain may be utilized to remove existing advertising structures or junkyards from within one thousand feet (1,000') of either side of designated Tennessee scenic highways.

Should the state fail to enforce this section, any citizen or group of citizens may institute legal proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction to require the state to enforce this section.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 10; 1976, ch. 819, § 8; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2510.

Cross-References. Advertising structures and junkyards prohibited on scenic highways, authority of commissioner to acquire, § 54-17-108.

Applicability to parkway system, § 54-17-206.

Billboard regulation and control, title 54, ch. 21.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

Attorney General Opinions. State billboard regulations, OAG 04-082 (4/30/04).

Collateral References.

Right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency. 60 A.L.R.3d 665.

54-17-111. Trash dumping prohibited — Penalties.

Dumping or disposal of trash or refuse within five hundred feet (500') of the highway right-of-way is specifically prohibited, and the usual penalties for littering state highways are doubled in the case of scenic highways.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 11; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2511.

Cross-References. Applicability to parkway system, § 54-17-206.

Criminal littering, penalties, § 39-14-502.

Litter control, title 39, ch. 14, part 5.

54-17-112. Criminal sanctions.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any provision of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Each and every day during which a violation of any provision of this part continues is deemed a separate offense.

The attorney general and reporter, the district attorney general for the judicial district in which the violation occurs or is threatened, any state, municipal or county official or any adjacent or neighboring property owner who would be damaged by a violation of this part, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may institute injunction, mandamus, abatement or other appropriate action, actions or proceedings to prevent, enjoin or abate or remove the violation.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 12; modified; T.C.A., § 54-2512; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Remedies and special proceedings, title 29.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

Attorney General Opinions. The General Assembly has expressly conferred on the district attorney general for the judicial district in which a violation of the Scenic Highway System Act occurs or is threatened the authority to bring a civil action—such as “injunction, mandamus, abatement or other appropriate action or proceeding”—seeking to prevent, enjoin, abate, or remove the violation. OAG 18-45, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (10/24/2018).

54-17-113. Statutory conflict.

Whenever a provision of this part is found to be in conflict with a provision of any private or public act or local ordinance or code, the provision that establishes the higher standard for promotion and protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the people shall prevail; provided, that §§ 54-17-108 and 54-17-115 shall prevail in all applicable instances, any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding.

Acts 1971, ch. 431, § 13; 1976, ch. 819, § 9; T.C.A., § 54-2513.